.config/sublime-text-3/Packages/User/en_ru.aff
SFX 110 Y 179
SFX 110   ться вутся        житься
SFX 110   ться вусь         житься
SFX 110   ться вешься       житься
SFX 110   ться вется        житься
SFX 110   ться ветесь       житься
SFX 110   ться вемся        житься
SFX 110   ться вёшься       житься
SFX 110   ться вётся        житься
SFX 110   ться вётесь       житься
SFX 110   ться вёмся        житься
SFX 110   ться нутся        деться
SFX 110   ться нусь         деться
SFX 110   ться нешься       деться
SFX 110   ться нется        деться
SFX 110   ться нетесь       деться
SFX 110   ться немся        деться
SFX 110   ться ешься        уться
SFX 110   ться ется         уться
SFX 110   ться етесь        уться
SFX 110   ться емся         уться
SFX 110   ться ются         уться
SFX 110   ться юсь          уться
SFX 110   ть   вут          жить
SFX 110   ть   ву           жить
SFX 110   ть   вешь         жить
SFX 110   ть   вете         жить
SFX 110   ть   вет          жить
SFX 110   ть   вем          жить
SFX 110   ть   вёшь         жить
SFX 110   ть   вёте         жить
SFX 110   ть   вёт          жить
SFX 110   ть   вём          жить
SFX 110   ть   нут          деть
SFX 110   ть   ну           деть
SFX 110   ть   нешь         деть
SFX 110   ть   нете         деть
SFX 110   ть   нет          деть
SFX 110   ть   нем          деть
SFX 110   ть   ешь          уть
SFX 110   ть   ете          уть
SFX 110   ть   ет           уть
SFX 110   ть   ем           уть
SFX 110   ть   ют           уть
SFX 110   ть   ю            уть
SFX 110   яться ешься        яться
SFX 110   яться ется         яться
SFX 110   яться етесь        яться
SFX 110   яться емся         яться
SFX 110   яться ются         яться
SFX 110   яться юсь          яться
SFX 110   яться ёшься        яться
SFX 110   яться ётся         яться
SFX 110   яться ётесь        яться
SFX 110   яться ёмся         яться
SFX 110   ять  ешь          ять
SFX 110   ять  ете          ять
SFX 110   ять  ет           ять
SFX 110   ять  ем           ять
SFX 110   ять  ют           ять
SFX 110   ять  ю            ять
SFX 110   ять  ёшь          ять
SFX 110   ять  ёте          ять
SFX 110   ять  ёт           ять
SFX 110   ять  ём           ять
SFX 110   оваться уешься       оваться
SFX 110   оваться уется        оваться
SFX 110   оваться уетесь       оваться
SFX 110   оваться уемся        оваться
SFX 110   оваться уются        оваться
SFX 110   оваться уюсь         оваться
SFX 110   оваться уёшься       оваться
SFX 110   оваться уётся        оваться
SFX 110   оваться уётесь       оваться
SFX 110   оваться уёмся        оваться
SFX 110   овать уешь         овать
SFX 110   овать уете         овать
SFX 110   овать ует          овать
SFX 110   овать уем          овать
SFX 110   овать уют          овать
SFX 110   овать ую           овать
SFX 110   овать уёшь         овать
SFX 110   овать уёте         овать
SFX 110   овать уёт          овать
SFX 110   овать уём          овать
SFX 110   иться ьешься       [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьется        [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьетесь       [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьемся        [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьются        [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьюсь         [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьёшься       [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьётся        [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьётесь       [блпв]иться
SFX 110   иться ьёмся        [блпв]иться
SFX 110   ить  ьешь         [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ьете         [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ьет          [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ьем          [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ьют          [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ью           [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ьёшь         [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ьёте         [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ьёт          [блпв]ить
SFX 110   ить  ьём          [блпв]ить
SFX 110   хаться дутся        хаться
SFX 110   хаться дусь         хаться
SFX 110   хаться дешься       хаться
SFX 110   хаться дется        хаться
SFX 110   хаться детесь       хаться
SFX 110   хаться демся        хаться
SFX 110   хать дут          хать
SFX 110   хать ду           хать
SFX 110   хать дешь         хать
SFX 110   хать дете         хать
SFX 110   хать дет          хать
SFX 110   хать дем          хать
SFX 110   ечься яжешься      лечься
SFX 110   ечься яжется       лечься
SFX 110   ечься яжетесь      лечься
SFX 110   ечься яжемся       лечься
SFX 110   ечься ягутся       лечься
SFX 110   ечься ягусь        лечься
SFX 110   ечь  яжешь        лечь
SFX 110   ечь  яжете        лечь
SFX 110   ечь  яжет         лечь
SFX 110   ечь  яжем         лечь
SFX 110   ечь  ягут         лечь
SFX 110   ечь  ягу          лечь
SFX 110   еваться уется        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться уются        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться уётся        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юешься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юется        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юетесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юемся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юются        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться ююсь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юёшься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юётся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юётесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   еваться юёмся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 110   евать уешь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать уете         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать ует          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать уем          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать уют          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать ую           [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать уёшь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать уёте         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать уёт          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать уём          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юешь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юете         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юет          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юем          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юют          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юю           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юёшь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юёте         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юёт          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   евать юём          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 110   аться лешься       паться
SFX 110   аться лется        паться
SFX 110   аться летесь       паться
SFX 110   аться лемся        паться
SFX 110   аться лются        паться
SFX 110   аться люсь         паться
SFX 110   ать  ут           дать
SFX 110   ать  у            дать
SFX 110   ать  лешь         пать
SFX 110   ать  лете         пать
SFX 110   ать  лет          пать
SFX 110   ать  лем          пать
SFX 110   ать  лют          пать
SFX 110   ать  лю           пать
SFX 110   ать  ешь          дать
SFX 110   ать  ете          дать
SFX 110   ать  ет           дать
SFX 110   ать  ем           дать
